Utah statutes.
72-3-207.    State Park Access Highways Improvement Program -- Distribution
-- Rulemaking.
(1)  There is created the State Park Access Highways Improvement Program
within the department.
(2)  The program shall be funded from the following revenue sources:
(a)  any voluntary contributions received for improvements to state park
access highways; and
(b)  appropriations made to the program by the Legislature.
(3)  The department may use the program money as matching grants to a county
or municipality for the improvement of class B or class C roads specified as
state park access highways under this part subject to:
(a)  money available in the program;
(b)  prioritization of the program money by the commission;
(c)  a county or municipality providing at least 50% of the cost of each
improvement project in matching funds; and
(d)  rules made under Subsection (4).
(4)  The department shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, necessary to administer the program and to
establish the procedures for a county or municipality to apply for a grant of
program money.
(5)  The department shall commit funds for state park access highway projects
for the amount of funding currently programmed in a funded year in the 2007
Statewide Transportation Improvement Program.
